Utah statutes.
70A-9a-105.   Control of electronic chattel paper.

(1)  A secured party has control of electronic chattel paper if a system employed by evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the secured party as the person to whom the chattel paper was assigned.

(2)  A system satisfies Subsection (1) if the record or records comprising the chattel paper are created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that:

(a)  a single authoritative copy of the record or records exists which is unique, identifiable and, except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2)(d), (e), and (f), unalterable;

(b)  the authoritative copy identifies the secured party as the assignee of the record or records;

(c)  the authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the secured party or its designated custodian;

(d)  copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the secured party;

(e)  each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

(f)  any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.



Amended by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

